Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,231
Forcible entry and detainer; writ of execution; service; writ of error stays proceedings.

The officer shall, within ten days after receiving the writ, execute the same by restoring the plaintiff to the possession of the premises, and shall levy and collect the costs, and make return as upon other executions. If the officer shall receive a notice from the court that the proceedings have been stayed by an allowance of a writ of error, he shall immediately delay all further proceedings upon the execution; and if the premises have been restored to the plaintiff, he shall immediately place the defendant in the possession thereof, and return the writ, with his proceedings and costs taxed thereon.

Laws 1929, c. 82, § 130, p. 312;

C.S.1929, § 22-1214;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,131;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 81;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-581.